Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4618.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 504. (1) A membership interest is personal property and may be held in any manner in which personal property may be held. A husband and wife Spouses may hold a membership interest in joint tenancy in the same manner and subject to the same restrictions, consequences, and conditions that apply to the ownership of real estate held jointly by a husband and wife spouses under the laws of this state, with full right of ownership by survivorship in case of the death of either. (2) A member has no interest in specific limited liability company property. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution ____ (request no. S00781'25) or House Joint Resolution F (request no. H00781'25) of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.